Washington statutes.
RCW 9.62.010

Malicious prosecution.

Every person who shall, maliciously and without probable cause therefor, cause or attempt to cause another to be arrested or proceeded against for any crime of which he or she is innocent:

(1) If such crime be a felony, is guilty of a class C felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than five years; and

(2) If such crime be a gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 40; 1992 c 7 s 15; 1909 c 249 s 117; Code 1881 s 899; 1873 p 203 s 98; 1854 p 92 s 89; RRS s 2369.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.